Maryland, session 2025, SB0375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
3–105.2.
Article – Criminal Law
10–608.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 1 –

Ch. 184 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) “ENCLOSURE” MEANS A STRUCTURE USED FOR CONFINEMENT,
INCLUDING A WIRE CAGE OR AN ITEM TRADITIONALLY USED FOR ANOTHER
PURPOSE SUCH AS A WATER TANK OR PLASTIC BARREL, THAT:
(I) IS USED TO PROVIDE LONG–TERM HOUSING FOR ONE ADULT
ROOSTER; AND
(II) PREVENTS INTERACTION WITH OTHER ROOSTERS.
(2) (3) “PROPERTY” MEANS:
(I) A A PARCEL OF LAND; OR
(II) A A COMBINATION OF PARCELS OF LAND OPERATING AS A
SINGLE UNIT.
(3) (4) “ROOSTER” MEANS A MALE CHICKEN THAT:
(I) IS IS AT LEAST 6 MONTHS OLD;
(II) HAS HAS FULLY DEVELOPED AN ADULT PLUMAGE; OR
(III) IS IS CAPABLE OF CROWING.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) COMMERCIAL COMMERCIAL POULTRY PRODUCERS, AS DEFINED
IN § 8–704.2 OF THIS ARTICLE THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE;
(2) A A PUBLIC SCHOOL OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT RECEIVES
STATE FUNDS;
(3) A A GOVERNMENT–OPERATED ANIMAL SHELTER;
(4) AN AN ANIMAL WELFARE ORGANIZATION, AS DEFINED IN § 19–701
OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE; OR
(5) A A MEMBER OF A 4–H OR FUTURE FARMERS OF AMERICA
PROGRAM IF, ON REQUEST OF AN ANIMAL CONTROL OFFICER, AN OFFICER OF A
COUNTY HUMANE SOCIETY, OR A POLICE OFFICER, THE MEMBER PROVIDES IN
WRITING PROOF OF:
(I) MEMBERSHIP MEMBERSHIP IN A 4–H OR FUTURE
FARMERS OF AMERICA PROGRAM; AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 184
(II) AUTHORIZATION AUTHORIZATION FROM THE COUNTY IN
WHICH THE ROOSTERS ARE LOCATED THAT SPECIFIES:
1. THE THE REASON FOR KEEPING MORE THAN 5
ROOSTERS PER ACRE OR MORE THAN 25 ROOSTERS ON A PROPERTY;
2. THE THE NUMBER OF ROOSTERS THAT MAY BE KEPT;
3. THE THE BREED OF EACH ROOSTER THAT MAY BE
KEPT;
4. THE THE DURATION OF TIME EACH ROOSTER MAY BE
KEPT; AND
5. THE THE ADDRESS OF THE PROPERTY WHERE EACH
ROOSTER MAY BE KEPT; OR
(6) A PERSON IF, ON REQUEST OF AN ANIMAL CONTROL OFFICER, AN
OFFICER OF A COUNTY HUMANE SOCIETY, OR A POLICE OFFICER, THE PERSON
PROVIDES IN WRITING PROOF THAT THE PERSON KEPT MORE ADULT HENS THAN
ROOSTERS WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6–MONTH PERIOD.
(C) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, UNLESS AUTHORIZED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, A PERSON WHO KEEPS ROOSTERS THAT ARE MAINTAINED
INDIVIDUALLY AND KEPT MAY NOT KEEP A ROOSTER MOVEMENT–CONSTRAINED
THROUGH THE USE OF AN ENCLOSURE OR TETHER MAY NOT:
(1) KEEP MORE THAN 5 ROOSTERS PER ACRE ON A SINGLE
PROPERTY; OR
(2) KEEP MORE THAN A TOTAL OF 25 ROOSTERS ON A SINGLE
PROPERTY.
(D) (1) THIS SECTION DOES NOT AFFECT THE AUTHORITY OF A COUNTY,
MUNICIPALITY, OR UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO ENACT AND ENFORCE
STANDARDS OR REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO ROOSTERS THAT ARE MORE
STRINGENT THAN THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT OR SUPERSEDE ANY OTHER
COUNTY, MUNICIPAL, OR STATE LAW, RULE, OR REGULATION THAT PROVIDES MORE
STRINGENT REQUIREMENTS REGARDING THE KEEPING OF ROOSTERS.
(E) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS:
– 3 –

Ch. 184 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000; OR
(2) SUBJECT TO ENFORCEMENT UNDER § 3–119 OF THIS SUBTITLE
(1) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS A CIVIL OFFENSE.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A WARNING;
(II) FOR A SECOND OFFENSE, A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO $500
PER ROOSTER; AND
(III) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A CIVIL PENALTY
OF UP TO $1,000 PER ROOSTER.
(3) THIS SECTION MAY BE ENFORCED BY:
(I) ANY STATE OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER; OR
(II) A LOCAL ANIMAL CONTROL AUTHORITY FOR THE
JURISDICTION WHERE THE VIOLATION OCCURS.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WORK IN COOPERATION WITH A LOCAL ANIMAL
CONTROL OR LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER TO ENFORCE THIS SECTION.
(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE THE
DEPARTMENT TO CONDUCT ADDITIONAL INSPECTIONS BEYOND THOSE
INSPECTIONS REQUIRED BY LAW.
(H) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –